Illinois, session 104th, SB1433.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 11-80 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/11-80)7    Sec. 11-80. Assessment procedure for railroad companies. 8In assessing the taxable property of any railroad company, the 9Department shall first determine 33 1/3% of the fair cash 10value of all the property of any railroad company based on the 11location of the property as a unit, but shall make due 12allowance for any non-carrier real estate and all personalty.13    The Department shall take into consideration the actual or 14market value of the shares of stock outstanding, the actual or 15market value of all bonds outstanding and all other 16indebtedness as is applicable, for operating the road. In 17determining the market value of the stock or indebtedness the 18Department shall consider quotations for the 5 years preceding 19the assessment date; the net earnings of the company during 20the 5 calendar years preceding the assessment date; and such 21other information as the Department may consider as bearing on 22the fair cash value of the property. The valuation by the 23Department shall include capital stock and all other property   SB1433- 2 -LRB104 07673 HLH 17717 b1of railroad companies, except non-carrier real estate. The 2above facts shall not be conclusive upon the Department in 3determining 33 1/3% of the fair cash value of the property of a 4railroad company.5    The Department shall determine the equalized assessed 6value of the taxable property of every railroad company by 7applying to its determination of 33 1/3% of the fair cash value 8of the property an equalization factor equal to the statewide 9average ratio of the equalized assessed value of locally 10assessed property to 33 1/3% of the fair cash value of such 11locally assessed property.12    The Department shall assess the value of all operating 13property acquired by a railroad company or its wholly-owned 14subsidiary by trade with a municipality, which is situated in 15a state contiguous to Illinois, at no greater value than the 16value of the operating property traded to the municipality for 17the property by the railroad company. The value shall be that 18value established for the year immediately preceding the 19calendar year of the trade. The assessment shall not increase, 20but may decrease, during the 10 years following the calendar 21year of the trade.22(Source: P.A. 86-173; 86-905; 86-1028; 88-455.)